Oklahoma, session 2025, SB839.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 205 of Title 75A, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


1. For purposes of this section, “social media platform” means


a website or internet medium that:


a. permits a person to become a registered user,


establish an account, or create a profile for the


purpose of allowing users to create, share, and view


user-generated content through such an account or


profile,


b. enables one or more users to generate content that can


be viewed by other users of the medium, and



Req. No. 258 Page 1


c. primarily serves as a medium for users to interact


with content generated by other users of the medium.


2. Social media platforms shall be deemed addictive and


dangerous to mental health, especially that of minors.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-258 CN 1/19/2025 5:44:24 AM



































Req. No. 258 Page 2